Missouri, session 2026, HB1935.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 66.010, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 66.010, to read as follows:
66.010. 1. Any county framing and adopting a charter for its own government under
the provisions of Section 18, Article VI of the Constitution of this state, may prosecute and
punish violations of its county ordinances in the circuit court of such counties in the manner
and to the extent herein provided or in a county municipal court. In addition, the county may
prosecute and punish municipal ordinance violations in the county municipal court pursuant
to a contract with any municipality within the county. Any county municipal court
established pursuant to the provisions of this section shall have jurisdiction over violations of
that county's ordinances and the ordinances of municipalities with which the county has a
contract to prosecute and punish violations of municipal ordinances of the city. Costs and
procedures in any such county municipal court shall be governed by the provisions of law
relating to municipal ordinance violations in municipal divisions of circuit courts.
2. In any county which has elected to establish a county municipal court pursuant to
this section, the judges for such court shall be appointed by the county executive of such
county, subject to confirmation by the legislative body of such county in the same manner as
confirmation for other county appointed officers. The number of judges appointed, and
qualifications for their appointment, shall be established by ordinance of the county.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1935 2
3. The number of divisions of such county municipal court and its term shall be
established by ordinance of the county.
4. [Except in any county with a charter form of government and with more than six
hundred thousand but fewer than seven hundred thousand inhabitants, the ordinance of the
county shall provide for regular sessions of court in the evening hours after 6:00 p.m. and at
locations outside the county seat. In any county with a charter form of government and with
more than six hundred thousand but fewer than seven hundred thousand inhabitants, the
ordinance of the county may provide for regular sessions of court in the evening hours after
6:00 p.m. and at locations outside the county seat.
5.] Judges of the county municipal court shall be licensed to practice law in this state
and shall be residents of the county in which they serve. Municipal court judges shall not
accept or handle cases in their practice of law which are inconsistent with their duties as a
municipal court judge and shall not be a judge or prosecutor for any other court.
[6.] 5. In establishing the county municipal court, provisions shall be made for
appropriate circumstances whereby defendants may enter not guilty pleas and obtain trial
dates by telephone or written communication without personal appearance, or to plead guilty
and deliver by mail or electronic transfer or other approved method the specified amount of
the fine and costs as otherwise provided by law, within a specified period of time.
[7.] 6. In a county municipal court established pursuant to this section, the county
may provide by ordinance for court costs not to exceed the sum which may be provided by
municipalities for municipal violations before municipal courts. The county municipal judge
may assess costs against a defendant who pleads guilty or is found guilty except in those
cases where the defendant is found by the judge to be indigent and unable to pay the costs.
The costs authorized in this subsection are in addition to service costs, witness fees and jail
costs that may otherwise be authorized to be assessed, but are in lieu of other court or judge
costs or fees. Such costs shall be collected by the authorized clerk and deposited into the
county treasury.
[8.] 7. Provisions shall be made for recording of proceedings, except that if such
proceedings are not recorded, then, in that event, a person aggrieved by a judgment of a traffic
judge or commissioner shall have the right of a trial de novo. The procedures for perfecting
the right of a trial de novo shall be the same as that provided under sections 512.180 to
512.320, except that the provisions of subsection 2 of section 512.180 shall not apply to such
cases. In the event that such proceedings are recorded, all final decisions of the county
municipal court shall be appealable on such record to the appellate court with appropriate
jurisdiction.
[9.] 8. Any person charged with the violation of a county ordinance in a county which
has established a county municipal court under the provisions of this section shall, upon

HB 1935 3
request, be entitled to a trial by jury before a county municipal court judge. Any jury trial
shall be heard with a record being made.
[10.] 9. In the event that a court is established pursuant to this section, the circuit
judges of the judicial circuit with jurisdiction within that county may authorize the judges of
the county municipal court to act as commissioners to hear in the first instance nonfelony
violations of state law involving motor vehicles as provided by local rule.
✔